en: Lactiplantibacillus
xx: Lactiplantibacillus

en: Lactiplantibacillus plantarum, Lactobacillus arabinosus, Lactobacillus plantarum, L. plantarum
xx: Lactiplantibacillus plantarum, Lactobacillus arabinosus, Lactobacillus plantarum, L. plantarum
pl: żywe kultury bakterii Lactiplantibacillus plantarum, żywe kultury bakterii Lactobacillus plantarum
zh: 植物乳桿菌

en: Lactiplantibacillus plantarum 299v
xx: Lactiplantibacillus plantarum 299v, Lactobacillus plantarum 299v, L. plantarum 299v, LP299V

en: Bacillus coagulans
xx: Bacillus coagulans
de: Lactobacillus sporogenes
fi: lactobacillus sporogenes
zh: 芽孢乳酸菌

en: Lacticaseibacillus paracasei, Lc. paracasei, L. paracasei
xx: Lacticaseibacillus paracasei, Lc. paracasei, L. paracasei

en: Lactococcus lactis
xx: Lactococcus lactis

en: Streptococcus thermophilus, s.thermophilus
xx: Streptococcus thermophilus, s.thermophilus
bg: streptococcus thermophilus, Streptococcus salivarius subsp. thermophilus
de: Streptococcus thermophilus, Str. thermophilus
es: Streptococcus thermophilus, thermophilus
fi: Streptococcus thermophilus, s. thermophilus
hr: streptococcus thermophilus
it: streptococcus thermophilius, s. thermophilus, thermophilus
ja: サーモフィラス菌
pl: streptococcus thermophilus, Streptococcus salivarius ssp. thermophilus
sv: Streptococcus thermophilus, s. thermophilus
zh: 嗜热链球菌

fr: ferments de maturation
hr: kulture za zrenje

en: maturing ferments
de: Reifungskulturen, Reifekulturen
fr: ferments d'affinage
it: fermenti di stagionatura

en: selected ferments
de: ausgewählte Kulturen
es: fermentos seleccionados
fr: ferments sélectionnés
hr: odabrani fermenti
it: fermenti selezionati
nl: geselecteerde fermenten
pt: fermentos selecionados

en: enzyme
af: ensiem
an: enzima
ar: ئەنزیم
as: উৎসেচক
bg: Ензим, ензими, комплекс ензими
bn: উৎসেচক
br: enzim
bs: enzim
ca: enzim
cs: enzym
cy: ensym
da: enzym, enzymer
de: Enzym
el: Ένζυμο
eo: enzimo
es: enzima
et: ensüüm
eu: entzima
fa: آنزیم
fi: entsyymi
fo: kveiki
fr: Enzyme
ga: einsím
gl: enzima
he: אנזים
hi: प्रकिण्व
hr: enzim, enzimi
ht: anzim
hu: enzim
hy: Ֆերմենտ
ia: enzyma
id: enzim
io: enzimo
is: ensím
it: enzima, enzimi
ja: 酵素
jv: Ènzim
ka: ფერმენტები
ko: 효소
ku: enzîm
la: enzymum
li: enzym
lv: enzīms
mk: eнзим
ml: രാസാഗ്നി
mn: Фермент
mr: उत्प्रेरक
ms: eEnzim
my: အင်န်ဇိုင်း
nb: enzym, enzymer
nl: enzym, enzymen
nn: enzym
oc: enzim
pa: ਐੱਨਜ਼ਾਈਮ
pl: enzymy
ps: انزايم
pt: enzima
qu: huptana
ro: enzimă, enzime
ru: Ферменты
se: entsyma
sh: enzim
si: එන්සයිම
sk: enzým
sl: encim
so: Ensiim
sq: enzima
sr: Ензим
su: Énzim
sv: enzym, enzymer
sw: kimeng'enya
ta: நொதியம்
te: ఎంజైము
th: เอนไซม์
tl: ensaym
tr: enzim
ur: خامرہ
vi: enzym
yi: ענזים
zh: 酶

en: rennet
an: Cuallo
ar: منفحة
bg: сирищен ензим, сирищни ензими
bs: Sirište
ca: quall
co: Pirrulu
cs: Syřidlo
da: osteløbe, animalsk og mikrobiel løbe, microbiel løbe
de: Lab
el: πυτιά
es: cuajo
et: Laap
eu: Gatzagi
fi: juoksute, juoksete
fr: présure
ga: Binid
gd: Binid
gl: Callo
gu: Reenet
he: אנזים הגבנה
hr: sirište, sirilo
hu: Oltóenzim, oltóanyag
id: Rennet
is: ostahleypir
it: caglio
ja: レンネット
ko: 레닛
la: Coagulum
lt: Šliužo fermentas
lv: rennēts
ms: Renet
nb: løype, osteløype, løpe, osteløpe, animalsk og mikrobiell løpe
nl: stremsel
nn: løpe, løype
pl: podpuszczka
pt: coalho, quimosina
ro: cheag
ru: рассол
sr: сириште
sv: löpe, ostlöpe, ostenzym
tr: lab
zh: 凝乳酶

en: animal-based rennet, animal rennet
da: animalsk løbe
de: Lab auf tierischer Basis, tierisches Lab
el: πυτία ζώων
es: cuajo animal, cuajo de origen animal, cuajo natural de origen animal
fi: eläinperäinen juoksute
fr: présure animale
hr: sirilo životinjskog podrijetla
hu: állati eredetű oltóenzim
it: caglio animale
nb: animalsk løpe
nl: dierlijk stremsel
nn: animalsk løpe
pl: podpuszczka zwierzęca
pt: coalho animal

en: calf rennet
de: Kälberlab
es: cuajo bovino
fi: vasikanjuoksute, naudanjuoksute, vasikkaperäinen juoksute, nautaperäinen juoksute
fr: présure de veau, présure bovine
hr: teleće sirilo
it: Caglio di vitello
nl: kalfsstremsel
pl: podpuszczka cielęca

en: vegetarian rennet, vegetable rennet, non animal rennet
da: vegetabilsk osteløbe
de: vegetarisches Lab, Labaustauschstoff
fi: kasviperäinen juustonjuoksutin, kasviperäinen juoksete
fr: Présure végétarienne, présure végétale
hr: vegetarijansko sirilo
it: Caglio vegetale
lv: veģetārais rennīts
nl: vegetarisch stremsel
sv: vegetabiliskt ystenzym

en: microbial rennet
cs: mikrobiální syřidlo
da: mikrobiel osteløbe, mikrobiel løbe
de: mikrobielles Lab, mikrobiologisches Lab
es: cuajo microbial, Cuajo microbiano
fi: mikrobiperäinen juoksute, mikrobiologinen juoksute, mikrobinen juoksute
fr: présure microbienne, enzyme microbien
hr: mikrobno sirilo
hu: mikrobiológiai oltóenzim
it: caglio microbico, caglio microbiologico
lv: mikrobiālais rennīts
nb: mikrobiell løpe
nl: microbieel stremsel, microbieel stremmiddel
pl: podpuszczka mikrobiologiczna
pt: coalho microbiano
ro: cheag microbian
sv: mikrobiell ostlöpe, ystenzym, mikrobiellt ystenzym, mikrobiellt löpe, mikrobiellt

en: sheep rennet
de: Schafslab
es: cuajo ovino
fr: présure de brebis
hr: ovčje sirilo
it: Caglio di pecora
nl: schapenstremsel
pt: coalho de ovelha

en: cellulase
ar: سليولاز
bg: целулаза
bs: Celulaza
ca: cellulasa
de: Cellulase
es: Celulasa
et: Tsellulaas
fi: sellulaasi, sellulaasit
fr: cellulase
hr: celulaza
hu: celluláz
id: Selulase
it: Cellulasi
ja: セルラーゼ
ko: 셀룰레이스
nl: cellulase
nn: cellulase
pl: Celulaza, celulazy
pt: celulase
ru: Целлюлаза
sh: Celulaza
sr: Celulaza
sv: Cellulaser
tr: Selülaz
uk: Целюлаза
vi: Cellulase
zh: 纤维素酶

en: hemicellulase
de: Hemicellulase, Hemicellulasen
fi: hemisellulaasi, hemisellulaasit
fr: hémicellulase
hr: hemicelulaza
it: emicellulasi

en: Lactase, lactase enzyme
ar: لكتاز
bg: лактаза
bn: ল্যাকটেজ
ca: lactasa
cs: laktáza
da: laktase, laktaseenzym
de: Lactase, Laktase
el: Λακτάση
eo: laktazo, β-galaktozidazo
es: lactasa, enzima lactasa
eu: laktasa
fa: لاکتاز
fi: laktaasi, laktaasientsyymi
fr: lactase
gl: lactase
he: לקטאז
hr: laktaza, laktazu, laktozu, enzim laktaza
hu: laktáz, laktáz enzim, laktázenzim
io: laktazo
is: laktasi
it: lattasi, enzima lattasi
ja: ラクターゼ
ko: 락테이스
lt: laktazė
mk: Лактаза
nl: lactase
oc: lactasa
pl: laktaza, enzym laktaza
pt: lactase
ru: Лактаза
sh: laktaza
sk: laktáza
sl: laktaza
sq: laktozë
sr: laktaza
sv: laktas, laktasenzym
tl: lactase
tr: laktaz
uk: Лактаза
uz: laktaza
vi: lactase
zh: 乳糖酶